Georgia, session 2025_26, SB170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Every Georgian has the right to life, liberty, and property under the Constitution of the
State of Georgia;
(2) The protection of persons and property is the paramount duty of government;
(3) No Georgian shall be denied equal protection under the law;
(4) The government of the State of Georgia is instituted for the protection, security, and
benefit of the people;
S. B. 170
- 1 -

LC 60 0123S (SCS)
(5) In 2022, the Georgia State Senate created a Study Committee on Unsheltered
Homelessness to study the issue, assess evidence for different policies, solicit input, and
develop recommendations for improvements to the law that would aid those experiencing
homelessness;
(6) In 2022, the Georgia State Senate found that the state should continue to oppose the
criminalization of homelessness, and the Study Committee on Unsheltered Homelessness
did not recommend any legal action against unsheltered or sheltered homeless individuals
based on housing status; and
(7) This Act reinforces the General Assembly's commitment to the safety and security of
those state residents who remain unhoused.
SECTION 2.
Chapter 12 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to commissions
and other agencies, is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
"ARTICLE 9
50-12-140.
(a) There is created the Georgia Interagency Council for the Homeless for the purpose of
ensuring a coordinated state-wide approach to addressing homelessness.
(b) As used in this Code section, the term 'council' means the Georgia Interagency Council
for the Homeless.
(c) The council shall consist of the following 21 members who shall be appointed by the
Governor:
(1) The commissioner of community affairs or his or her designee;
(2) One member from the Attorney General's office;
S. B. 170
- 2 -

LC 60 0123S (SCS)
(3) One member from the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental
Disabilities;
(4) One member from the Department of Corrections;
(5) One member from the Division of Aging Services within the Department of Human
Services;
(6) One member from the Governor's Office for Children and Families;
(7) One member from the Department of Veterans Service;
(8) One member from the Georgia Housing and Finance Authority;
(9) One member from the Department of Community Affairs;
(10) One member from the Department of Transportation;
(11) One member from the Department of Public Health;
(12) One member from the Department of Public Safety;
(13) One member from the State Board of Pardons and Paroles;
(14) One member from the Continuum of Care Network;
(15) One member from the Department of Community Supervision;
(16) Three members who have personally experienced homelessness; and
(17) Three members representing service providers to the homeless.
(d) Councilmembers appointed pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section shall serve
for a period of three years.
(e) A vacancy on the council shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment
was made.
(f) The commissioner of community affairs or his or her appointee shall serve as the
chairperson of the council.
(g) The council shall:
(1) Survey current resources for services for the homeless in this state;
(2) Initiate an evaluation of the current and future needs for the services;
S. B. 170
- 3 -

LC 60 0123S (SCS)
(3) Assist in coordinating and providing state-wide services for all homeless individuals
in this state;
(4) Increase the flow of information among separate providers and appropriate
authorities;
(5) Develop guidelines to monitor the provision of services for the homeless and the
methods of delivering those services;
(6) Coordinate with the State Workforce Development Board, homeless shelters, and
public and private entities to provide homeless individuals information on services
available to assist them in obtaining employment and job training;
(7) Establish a central resource and information center for the homeless in this state;
(8) Coordinate state-wide efforts to combat the criminalization of homelessness;
(9) Ensure that local or state-wide nonprofit organizations perform the duties under this
subsection that the council is unable to perform; and
(10) Meet at least once per quarter to set the goals of the council and review the work
described in this Code section.
(h) The council, no later than December 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, shall submit to
the office of the Governor a report detailing the council's activities, findings, and any
recommendations. Any reports generated by the council shall be made available on an
annual basis by the department to the members of the General Assembly, all departments
and agencies of state government, all county and municipal governments, and members of
the general public by posting such reports on the appropriate state agency public websites.
(i) Councilmembers shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be allowed
actual and necessary expenses in the performance of their duties. Citizen members shall
receive a daily expense allowance in the amount specified in subsection (b) of Code
Section 45-7-21 as well as the mileage or transportation allowance authorized for state
employees. If any members selected to serve on the council are state officials or are state
employees, they shall receive no compensation for their services on the council but shall
S. B. 170
- 4 -

LC 60 0123S (SCS)
be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the
council in the same manner as reimbursements are made in their capacity as state officials
or state employees. The funds necessary for the reimbursement of the expenses of state
officials and state employees shall come from funds appropriated to or otherwise available
to their respective departments.
(j) The council shall be abolished and this article shall stand repealed on
December 31, 2028."
SECTION 3.
100 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 170
- 5 -